Nebraska, session 109, LB359.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB359 LB359
2025 2025
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department
of Health and Human Services and the Supreme Court be appropriated funds
equivalent to implement a five-percent increase for fiscal year 2025-26
to reimbursement rates for all child welfare service providers under
Agency 25, Department of Health and Human Services, Program 354, Child
Welfare Aid, and Agency 5, Supreme Court, Program 437, Juvenile Justice.
This increase is intended to be in addition to any other increase
provided by law. The child welfare and juvenile justice service providers
receiving the increase, for those services currently used by Agency 25
and Agency 5, include providers of Group Home Services, Out-of-Home Care
Services, Out-of-Home Maintenance, Agency-Supported Foster Care,
Emergency Shelter Center Care, Agency-Supported Respite Care, Drug
Testing, In-Home Family Support, Out-of-Home Family Support, Supervised
Visitation, In-Home Safety, Family Finding, Options Education, Kinship
Navigation, Home Studies, Travel Time and Distance, Intensive Family
Preservation, Intensive Family Reunification Service, and any other
service presently contracted for by the department with one or more
private providers that is intended to meet the needs of children and
families in Nebraska.
-2-